Tennessee, session 114, HB2056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-3-110, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) The state board of cosmetology and barber examiners shall use a student
identification number for applicants accruing instructional hours in order to apply for an
examination. The board shall not use a student's social security number on an hourly
report form and shall instead use the student identification number until a student is
ready to take an examination or receive a certificate of registration.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-3-124, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) The board shall use a student identification number for applicants accruing
instructional hours in order to apply for a certificate of registration as a barber instructor.
The board shall not use a student's social security number and shall instead use the
student identification number until a student is ready to be registered. The board shall
use the student identification number for a barber instructor's biennial reporting required
by subsection (b).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-4-105, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(g) The board shall create and maintain a student identification number for each
applicant accruing instructional hours in order to apply for a certificate of registration or
HB2056
011451
- 1 -

license under the authority of the board. The board shall not use a student's social
security number as a public-facing identifier of the person and shall instead use the
person's student identification number.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-4-110, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(g) The board shall use a student identification number for applicants accruing
instructional hours in order to apply for an examination. The board shall not use a
student's social security number on an hourly report form and shall instead use the
student identification number until a student is ready to take an examination or receive a
license.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-4-114, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) The board shall use the active instructor's student identification number for
reporting ongoing or initial instructional hours required by subsections (a) and (b).
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-4-135, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) The board shall use a student identification number for applicants accruing
instructional hours for a certificate. The board shall not use a student's social security
number on an hourly report form and shall instead use the student identification number
until a student is ready to receive a certificate.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011451